District of Columbia statutes.
29A-618

Repealed

Title of institution not to imply official connection with government of United States or District of Columbia.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 586e
Mar. 2, 1929, 45 Stat. 1505, ch. 523
Apr. 16, 1934, 48 Stat. 592, ch. 143
Nov. 7, 1966, 80 Stat. 1430, Pub. L. 89-791, title I, § 106
Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-104, § 6(a)(4), 23 DCR 8734
Sept. 21, 1988, D.C. Law 7-142, § 2, 35 DCR 5401
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 4004(b)(4), 52 DCR 7503
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(5), 58 DCR 1720
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4004(b)(4) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
1973 Ed., § 29-418.
1981 Ed., § 29-818.
2001 Ed., § 29-618.